ro-RO: Compatibilitatea crampoanelor: Pedală plată; Mountain bike (SPD cu 2 șuruburi); Cursieră (3 șuruburi); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Altele
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com travessas: Pedal plano; Montanha (SPD de 2 parafusos); Estrada (3 parafusos); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Outro
zh-CN: 锁片兼容性: 平踏板; 山地车（2 孔 SPD）; 公路车（3 孔）; SPD-SL; 棒棒糖踏板系统; 通用; 其他
hu: Stopli kompatibilitás: Lapos pedál; Mountain (2 csavaros SPD); Országúti (3 csavaros); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Univerzális; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilita s nášlapnými pedály: Plochý pedál; Horské (2 šrouby SPD); Silniční (3 šrouby); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Univerzální; Jiné
el: Συμβατότητα παπουτσιού με καρφιά: Επίπεδο πεντάλ; Mountain (SPD 2 βιδών); Δρόμου (3 βιδών); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Άλλο
vi: Độ tương thích của cá giày: Bàn đạp phẳng; Xe đạp leo núi (SPD 2 bu-lông); Xe đạp đường trường (3 bu-lông); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Đa năng; Khác
pt-BR: Compatibilidade da presilha/trava: Pedal plano; Mountain (2 parafusos SPD); Road (3 parafusos); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Outro
en: Cleat compatibility: Flat pedal; Mountain (2-bolt SPD); Road (3-bolt); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Other
fi: Klossin yhteensopivuus: Avopoljin; Maasto (2-pulttinen SPD); Maantie (3-pulttinen); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Yleismalli; Muu
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของคลีท: บันไดจักรยานแบบเรียบ; เมาน์เทน (2 น็อต SPD); โรด (3 น็อต); SPD-SL; Speedplay; ครอบจักรวาล; อื่นๆ
it: Compatibilità dei tacchetti: Pedale flat; Mountain (SPD 2 bulloni); Strada (3 bulloni); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universale; Altro
lt-LT: Spaustukų suderinamumas: Plokščias pedalas; Kalnų (2 varžtų SPD); Plento (3 varžtų); SPD-SL; „Speedplay“; Universalus; Kita
tr: Kilit sistemi uyumluluğu: Düz pedal; Dağ bisikleti (2 cıvatalı SPD); Yol bisikleti (3 cıvatalı); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Evrensel; Diğer
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost krampona: Ravna pedala; Brdski (SPD s 2 vijka); Cestovni (3 vijka); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Univerzalni; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibilitet for klosser: Flat pedal; Terreng (2-bolts SPD); Landevei (3-bolts); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universell; Annet
de: Stollenkompatibilität: Plattformpedale; Mountainbike (2-Loch-SPD); Rennrad (3-Loch); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Sonstige
nl: Compatibiliteit met schoenplaatjes: Plat pedaal; Mountainbike (2-bouts SPD); Racefiets (3-bouts); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universeel; Anders
ru: Совместимость с шипами: Платформенные педали; Горные (SPD на 2 болта); Шоссейные (на 3 болта); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Универсальная; Другая
fr: Compatibilité avec les crampons: Pédale plate; Montagne (SPD 2 boulons); Route (3 boulons); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universel; Autre
sl-SI: Združljivost kolesarskih čevljev: Ploska pedala; Gorska (SPD z 2 vijakoma); Cestna (3 vijaki); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Univerzalna; Drugo
zh-TW: 卡踏扣片相容性: 平踏板; 登山車 (2 孔 SPD); 公路車 (3 孔); SPD-SL; Speedplay; 通用; 其他
da: Klampekompatibilitet: Flad pedal; Mountainbike (2-bolt SPD); Landevej (3-bolt); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universel; Andet
ja: クリート適合性: フラットペダル; マウンテン (2つ穴 SPD); ロード (3つ穴); SPD-SL; Speedplay; ユニバーサル; その他
sv: Kompatibel med klossar: Platt pedal; Mountain (2-bults SPD); Road (3-bults); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universell; Annan
bg-BG: Съвместимост с шпайкове: Плосък педал; За планински велосипед (SPD с 2 болта); За шосеен велосипед (с 3 болта); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Универсална; Друго
ko: 클릿 호환성: 평페달; 산악용(2볼트 SPD); 도로용(3볼트); SPD-SL; 스피드플레이; 공용; 기타
es: Compatibilidad del taco: Pedal plano; Montaña (SPD de 2 tornillos); Carretera (3 tornillos); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Universal; Otro
pl: Zgodność kołków: Pedał platformowy; Górskie (2-śrubowe SPD); Szosowe (3-śrubowe); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Uniwersalne; Inna
sk-SK: Kompatibilita vystužovacej lišty: Plochý pedál; Horské (2-skrutkové SPD); Cestné (3-skrutkové); SPD-SL; Speedplay; Univerzálne; Iné